District of Columbia statutes.
24-241.06

Trust fund for earnings; disbursements.

The Mayor is authorized to include in individual work release plans provisions for the collection of the wages, salary, earnings, and other income of each gainfully employed prisoner when paid, or require that the same be surrendered when received, less payroll deductions required or authorized by law, and to deposit the amount so received in a trust fund account in the Treasury of the United States. Such wages, salary, or earnings in the hands of either the employer or the Mayor during such prisoner’s terms shall not be subject to garnishment or attachment. The Mayor is further authorized in individual work release plans to provide for disbursements from the trust fund account established under this section for any or all of the following purposes: (1) the payment of an amount not to exceed the lesser of 20% of the prisoner’s earnings, or $4 per day, as the cost of his room and board; (2) necessary travel expenses to and from work or other business and incidental expenses of the prisoner; (3) support of the prisoner’s dependents, if any; (4) support of minor children pursuant to court order; (5) payment of court fines or forfeitures; or (6) payment, either in full or ratably, of the prisoner’s debts which have been acknowledged by him in writing or have been reduced to judgment. The balance of such earnings, if any there be after payments therefrom for the foregoing purposes, shall be paid to the prisoner upon the completion of the period during which he is subject to confinement.

History

Nov. 10, 1966, 80 Stat. 1520, Pub. L. 89-803, § 7

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-241.07.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-466.
1973 Ed., § 24-466.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.